Washington statutes.
RCW 9.40.040

Operating engine or boiler without spark arrester.

Every person who shall operate or permit to be operated in dangerous proximity to any brush, grass or other inflammable material, any spark-emitting engine or boiler which is not equipped with a modern spark-arrester, in good condition, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1929 c 172 s 1; 1909 c 249 s 272; RRS s 2524.]